Hawaii statutes.
[§412:13-210] Separate assets. (a)
Each foreign bank that is licensed to establish and maintain a Hawaii state
branch or Hawaii state agency in this State shall keep the assets of its
business in this State separate and apart from the assets of its business
outside this State.

(b) The creditors of a foreign bank arising
out of transactions with, and recorded on the books of, its Hawaii state branch
or Hawaii state agency shall be entitled to absolute preference and priority
over the creditors of the foreign bank's offices located outside this State
with respect to the assets of the foreign bank in this State. [L 1996, c 155,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next